Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-628
Contract; termination provision required.

On and after October 1, 1989, any contract entered into by a county, city, or village relating to the conduct of a lottery shall include a provision permitting the county, city, or village to terminate the contract by giving thirty days' notice to the other party if such lottery has been discontinued by an election authorized under section 9-626 or 9-627.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 68.